Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 1. Inspection and Copying of Public Records.
Sec. 40.25.122.
Litigation disclosure.

A public record that is subject to disclosure and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

remains a public record subject to disclosure and copying even if the record is used for, included in, or relevant to litigation, including law enforcement proceedings, involving a public agency, except that with respect to a person involved in litigation, the records sought shall be disclosed in accordance with the rules of procedure applicable in a court or an administrative adjudication. In this section, “involved in litigation” means a party to litigation or representing a party to litigation, including obtaining public records for the party.

History.

(§ 6 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.25.122. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Administrative Code. —

For disclosure requirements, see 2 AAC 96, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There are legitimate public policy reasons for differentiating between record requests made by parties involved in litigation against the state and those made by other parties. When the state is involved in the litigation, requiring the discovery rules to apply to documents sought by the other side ensures that the state is not disadvantaged in litigation by its public records statutes. In short, it ensures equal footing for the state. This analysis simply does not apply when the state isn’t a party to the litigation. Thus, a request for public records from a person who is involved in litigation with the state should be declined, with the explanation that the person must obtain the document through the discovery process under the Civil Rules. If it not clear from the face of the request, the person should be asked if he or she is involved in litigation with an agency of the state. 1994 Inf. Op. Atty. Gen. 99 (February 4; 663-94-0509).

Sec. 40.25.123.
Supervision and regulation.

The Department of Administration shall supervise and adopt regulations for the operation and implementation of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

by public agencies in the executive branch, except the Alaska Railroad Corporation.

The legislative council shall supervise and adopt procedures for the operation and implementation of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

by public agencies in the legislative branch.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall supervise and adopt procedures for the operation and implementation of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

by public agencies in the judicial branch.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall supervise and adopt procedures for the operation and implementation of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

by the University of Alaska.

The regulations and procedures adopted under this section must include the establishment of procedures for making an administrative appeal of public agency action that is taken under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

In this section,

“action” includes the calculation of a fee, the denial of a fee reduction or waiver, and the denial of a request to inspect or copy a public record;

“public agency” does not include a municipality.

History.

(§ 6 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 103 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am E.O. No. 113 § 5 (2005); am § 40 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.25.123. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “ AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “ AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability and purpose, see 2 AAC 96, art. 1.

For disclosure requirements, see 2 AAC 96, art. 2.

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

For requests for electronic services and products, see 2 AAC 96, art. 4.

Sec. 40.25.124.
Appeals.

A person may appeal to the superior court the final administrative order made by a public agency under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 200 SLA 1990)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.25.124. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “ AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “ AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

Sec. 40.25.125.
Enforcement: injunctive relief.

A person having custody or control of a public record who denies, obstructs, or attempts to obstruct, or a person not having custody or control who aids or abets another person in denying, obstructing, or attempting to obstruct, the inspection of a public record subject to inspection under AS

40.25.110

or

40.25.120

may be enjoined by the superior court from denying, obstructing, or attempting to obstruct, the inspection of public records subject to inspection under AS

40.25.110

or

40.25.120

. A person may seek injunctive relief under this section without exhausting the person’s remedies under AS

40.25.123

—

40.25.124

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 200 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.25.125. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “AS

40.25.110

or

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 or 09.25.120” and “AS

40.25.123

—

40.25.124

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.123 — 09.25.124” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110, 09.25.120, 09.25.123, and 09.25.124.

Administrative Code. —

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

Sec. 40.25.140.
Confidentiality of library records.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the names, addresses, or other personal identifying information of people who have used materials made available to the public by a library shall be kept confidential, except upon court order, and are not subject to inspection under AS

40.25.110

or

40.25.120

. This section applies to a library operated by the state, a municipality, or a public school, including the University of Alaska.

Records of a public elementary or secondary school library identifying a minor child shall be made available on request to a parent or guardian of that child.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 1985; am § 84 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

09.25.140

. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “AS

40.25.110

or

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 or 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “a library” for “libraries” following “This section applies to”.

Sec. 40.25.151.
Confidentiality of retirement records.

Except as provided in (b) — (d) of this section, public records, including electronic services and products involving public records, containing information about a person and maintained under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.229

, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37 shall be kept confidential and are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

.

Records described in (a) of this section concerning a person who is a member or former member of a state retirement system who is still living may only be released to

the person or the person’s guardian;

the person’s employer or former employer;

a state agency authorized to obtain confidential information;

another person if the person has

written authorization for release from the affected member or former member or the member’s or former member’s guardian; or

a court order or subpoena to obtain the information.

Records described in (a) of this section concerning a member or former member of a state retirement system who is deceased or a deceased member’s named beneficiary may only be released to

the member’s named beneficiary or the beneficiary’s guardian;

the member’s or former member’s former employer;

a state agency authorized to obtain confidential information;

the personal representative of the member’s or former member’s estate;

another person if the person has

written authorization for release from the member or former member, the member’s named beneficiary, or the personal representative of the member’s or former member’s estate; or

a court order or subpoena to secure the information.

The name and address of a living person who is a member or former member of a state retirement system may be released to a retirement organization representing persons receiving benefits under a state retirement system if the retirement organization is affiliated with an organization representing employees of the employer under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act).

In this section, “state retirement system” means the teachers’ retirement system under AS 14.25, the judicial retirement system under AS 22.25, the retirement system for members of the national guard under AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.229

, the public employees’ retirement system under AS 39.35, or the elected public officers retirement system under former AS 39.37.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.25.151.
Renumbered in 2000, at which time, in subsection (a), “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect 2000 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 40.25.220.
Definitions for AS 40.25.100 — 40.25.295.

In AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“electronic services and products” means computer-related services and products provided by a public agency, including

electronic manipulation of the data contained in public records in order to tailor the data to the person’s request or to develop a product that meets the person’s request;

duplicating public records in alternative formats not used by a public agency, providing periodic updates of an electronic file or data base, or duplicating an electronic file or data base from a geographic information system;

providing online access to an electronic file or data base;

providing information that cannot be retrieved or generated by the existing computer programs of the public agency;

providing functional electronic access to the information system of the public agency; in this subparagraph, “functional access” includes the capability for alphanumeric query and printing, graphic query and plotting, nongraphic data input and analysis, and graphic data input and analysis;

providing software developed by a public agency or developed by a private contractor for a public agency;

generating maps or other standard or customized products from an electronic geographic information system;

“public agency” means a political subdivision, department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, council, committee, or other instrumentality of the state or a municipality; “public agency” includes the University of Alaska and the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

“public records” means books, papers, files, accounts, writings, including drafts and memorializations of conversations, and other items, regardless of format or physical characteristics, that are developed or received by a public agency, or by a private contractor for a public agency, and that are preserved for their informational value or as evidence of the organization or operation of the public agency; “public records” does not include proprietary software programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1967; am § 14 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 104 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am E.O. No. 113 § 18 (2005); am § 21 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.25.220

. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS

09.25.100

—
09.25.220.

In 1994, former paragraphs (2)-(4) and (7) were renumbered as AS

09.25.390

(1)-(4).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Permanent fund dividend applications are most certainly included as records developed by a public agency preserved both for informational value and as evidence of the operation of the agency, i.e., they are public records. In 1990, the legislature passed laws directing the state to provide special notice when requiring a person to supply personal information so that the person may, among other things, challenge the accuracy or completeness of the information. As a part of this Act, the legislature adopted a definition of “personal information.” This definition specifically excludes a person’s name and address. Thus, a person’s name and address are subject to disclosure, and the Department of Revenue must provide the names and addresses of PFD applicants to any member of the public who requests the information and pays the required fees. 1992 Inf. Op. Atty. Gen. 161 (April 1; 663-92-0163).

Sec. 40.25.295.
Short title.

AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

may be cited as the Alaska Public Records Act.

History.

(§ 38 ch 40 SLA 2008)